Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 9. Copyright Royalties and Licensing.

Cross references. —

For severability of provisions of AS

45.45.500

—

45.45.590

, see § 3, ch. 50, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 45.45.500.
Notice required before contract.

A copyright owner or a performing rights society may not enter into, or offer to enter into, a contract for the payment of royalties by a business proprietor unless at the time of the offer, or within 72 hours before entering into the contract, the copyright owner or performing rights society provides to the business proprietor a notice containing

the rates and terms of the royalties under the contract, including any sliding scale, discounts, or reductions in rates on any basis, for which the business proprietor may be eligible, and any scheduled increases or decreases in rates during the term of the contract;

in the case of a performing rights society, a toll free number from which the business proprietor may obtain answers to inquiries concerning musical works and copyright owners represented by the performing rights society; and

in the case of a performing rights society, notice that the most recent available list of the members or affiliates represented by the performing rights society and the most recent available list of the copyrighted musical works in the performing rights society’s repertoire will be available on electronic media through the Cabaret Hotel and Restaurant Retail Association at the expense of the performing rights society.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1996)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 50, SLA 1996 provides that AS

45.45.500

—

45.45.530

do not apply to “a contract entered into, issued, or renewed before July 1, 1996.”

Sec. 45.45.510.
Minimum contents of royalties contracts.

A royalties contract entered into, issued, or renewed in this state must be in writing and signed by the parties. The contract must include at least the

business proprietor’s name and business address, and the name and location of each place of business of the business proprietor to which the contract applies;

duration of the contract; and

terms for the collection of the royalties and a rate schedule for the royalties, including any sliding scale, discount, or schedule for an increase or decrease of the rates during the term of the contract.

A contract for the payment of royalties entered into, issued, or renewed in this state may not exceed one year at a time, unless the contract is under the terms of a national agreement. When each year of the contract ends, the contract is automatically renewed on the same terms and conditions unless either party to the contract provides the other party with written notice of the party’s desire to terminate the contract or to change the terms and conditions. The notice must be given at least 30 days before the termination of the current term.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1996)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 50, SLA 1996 provides that AS

45.45.500

—

45.45.530

do not apply to “a contract entered into, issued, or renewed before July 1, 1996.”

Sec. 45.45.520.
Collection of royalties.

A copyright owner, a performing rights society, or an agent or employee of a copyright owner or performing rights society may not collect or attempt to collect a payment or another fee under a royalties contract between the copyright owner or performing rights society and a business proprietor unless the contract complies with AS

45.45.500

—

45.45.590

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1996)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 50, SLA 1996 provides that AS

45.45.500

—

45.45.530

do not apply to “a contract entered into, issued, or renewed before July 1, 1996.”

Sec. 45.45.530.
Prohibited practices.

A performing rights society, or an agent or employee of a performing rights society, may not collect or attempt to collect a royalty payment or another fee from a business proprietor licensed by the performing rights society, unless the collection or collection attempt is made under a contract entered into in accordance with AS

45.45.500

—

45.45.590

.

An agent or employee of a performing rights society may not enter a business proprietor’s premises to discuss a contract for the performance of copyrighted works or payment of royalties unless the agent or employee immediately discloses the purpose of the discussion and that the agent or employee is an agent or employee of a performing rights society.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1996)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 50, SLA 1996 provides that AS

45.45.500

—

45.45.530

do not apply to “a contract entered into, issued, or renewed before July 1, 1996.”

Sec. 45.45.550.
Private action.

A person who suffers a loss as a result of another person knowingly engaging in conduct that violates AS

45.45.500

—

45.45.590

may bring a civil action to recover actual damages and reasonable attorney fees, to enjoin the violation, and to seek any other remedy available at law or equity for the violation. In this section, “knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.45.560.
Exemptions.

The provisions of AS

45.45.500

—

45.45.590

do not apply to

a royalties contract between copyright owners, or performing rights societies, and

broadcasters licensed by the Federal Communications Commission; or

a cable television operator, a cable television programmer, or another transmission service;

an investigation by a law enforcement agency or other persons concerning a suspected violation of AS 45.50.900(a)(2);

contracts between copyright owners, or performing rights societies, and software publishers.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.45.570.
Construction.

AS

45.45.500

—

45.45.590

may not be construed to prevent a performing rights society from informing a business proprietor of the business proprietor’s obligations under 17 U.S.C. (federal copyright law) or from exercising any exclusive rights preempted under 17 U.S.C. 301(a).

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.45.590.
Definitions.

In AS

45.45.500

—

45.45.590

,

“business proprietor” means a person who owns a place of business in which the public may assemble and in which copyrighted musical works may be performed, broadcasted, or otherwise transmitted; in this paragraph, “place of business” includes a store, professional office, sports facility, entertainment facility, restaurant, hotel, or an alcoholic beverage establishment licensed under AS 04.11;

“copyright owner” means the owner of a copyright of a musical work if the copyright is recognized and enforceable under 17 U.S.C.; “copyright owner” does not include the owner of a copyright in all or part of a motion picture or an audiovisual work;

“musical work” means a nondramatic musical or similar work;

“performing rights society” means an association or corporation that licenses the public performance of musical works on behalf of copyright owners, and includes Broadcast Music, Inc., SESAC, Inc., and The American Society of Composers, Authors, and Publishers;

“royalties” means the fees payable to a copyright owner or a performing rights society for the public performance of a musical work;

“royalties contract” means a contract for the payment of royalties.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1996)

Sec. 45.45.590.
Definitions.

In AS

45.45.500

—

45.45.590

,

“business proprietor” means a person who owns a place of business in which the public may assemble and in which copyrighted musical works may be performed, broadcasted, or otherwise transmitted; in this paragraph, “place of business” includes a store, professional office, sports facility, entertainment facility, restaurant, hotel, or alcoholic beverage establishment licensed under AS 04.09;

“copyright owner” means the owner of a copyright of a musical work if the copyright is recognized and enforceable under 17 U.S.C.; “copyright owner” does not include the owner of a copyright in all or part of a motion picture or an audiovisual work;

“musical work” means a nondramatic musical or similar work;

“performing rights society” means an association or corporation that licenses the public performance of musical works on behalf of copyright owners, and includes Broadcast Music, Inc., SESAC, Inc., and The American Society of Composers, Authors, and Publishers;

“royalties” means the fees payable to a copyright owner or a performing rights society for the public performance of a musical work;

“royalties contract” means a contract for the payment of royalties.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1996; am § 162 ch 8 SLA 2022)